Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4669.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7b. (1) On request and without notice, a legislator must be granted entrance to inspect at any time any premises under the control of the department. (2) As used in this section, "legislator" means a member of the senate or the house of representatives of this state.